Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1

Wholesale Beer Tax

57-6-101. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Wholesale Beer Tax Act.”

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 1 (Williams, § 1051.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-301.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707.

57-6-102. Part definitions.

For the purposes of this part:

“Beer” means the beverage defined in § 57-5-101(b);

“County” means that portion of a county outside the corporate limits of municipalities therein;

“Department” means the department of revenue;

“Gross tax” means the amount of tax collected by a wholesaler;

“Municipality” means any town, city or taxing district incorporated under the laws of this state;

“Net tax” means the amount of tax to be paid to a county or municipality after deduction of the percentage due the department and the percentage retained by a wholesaler;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, syndicate, or any other combination of individuals;

“Quality control standard” means a standard under which a wholesaler determines whether beer is marketable due to product deterioration or due to improper packaging or handling by the manufacturer or wholesaler;

“Retailer” means a person who sells beer for consumption and not for resale;

“Wholesale” or “wholesale sale” means a sale, gift, or other transfer and delivery of beer by a wholesaler to any person other than another wholesaler, but there shall not be included within the meaning of either term any gratuitous dispensing of beer by a brewery of its own manufacture which is consumed on the premises; and

“Wholesaler” means a person or entity that sells beer to retailers, including any manufacturer authorized to sell directly to retailers pursuant to § 57-5-101.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 2 (Williams, § 1051.19); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1969, ch. 171, § 1; 1969, ch. 212, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-302; Acts 1983, ch. 229, § 8; 1986, ch. 524, § 1; 1988, ch. 466, § 1; 1990, ch. 618, § 13; 2005, ch. 298, § 4; 2015, ch. 19, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Licensing and taxation of hotels selling alcohol for consumption on the premises. OAG 16-05, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (2/9/2016).

57-6-103. Levy of tax — Disposition — Collection.

There is hereby imposed on the sale of beer at wholesale a tax equal to thirty-five dollars and sixty cents ($35.60) per barrel of thirty-one liquid gallons (31 gals.) of beer sold. The tax upon barrels containing more or less than thirty-one gallons (31 gals.) shall be taxed at a proportionate rate. Every wholesaler, on or before the twentieth day of each month, based on wholesale sales in the preceding calendar month, shall remit to each county the amount of the net tax on such person's wholesale sales to retailers and other persons in the county, and to each municipality the amount of the net tax on such person's wholesale sales to retailers and other persons within the corporate limits of the municipality.

For the purpose of this chapter, all sales made by wholesalers at the wholesalers' places of business as well as any sale or transfer contemplated by § 57-5-101(c)(2) by a manufacturer operating as a retailer to a location owned or operated by such manufacturer-retailer, shall be deemed to be wholesale sales and the tax herein imposed shall be collected on all such sales.

The tax collected on any such sales made to licensed retailers shall be paid to the county or municipality in which the retailer's place of business is located, and the tax on all other sales made at the wholesaler's place of business shall be paid to the county or city in which the wholesaler's place of business is located.

Seventeen cents (17¢) of the gross tax owed per barrel shall be remitted at the same time to the department, to be kept in a special fund and to be used only for expenses of the department in the administration of this chapter.

Ninety-two cents (92¢) of the gross tax owed per barrel shall be retained by the wholesaler or manufacturer operating as a retailer to defray the cost of collecting and remitting the tax.

Any municipality having a metropolitan form of government and a population of over four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census may, by ordinance of its legislative body, designate the county clerk as the collector of the tax herein authorized for the entire metropolitan taxing jurisdiction.

A municipality that is annexing territory by extension of its corporate limits or a new incorporating municipality shall provide written notice of the date of the annexation or incorporation and the name and address of each retailer located in the annexed or newly incorporated territory to each wholesaler selling beer within the annexed or newly incorporated territory. The municipality shall deliver the written notice to the wholesaler's representative designated pursuant to § 57-5-105(c)(6). The tax imposed by this section shall be due to the municipality beginning with the first full calendar month after receipt of the notice required by this subsection (g) and thereafter.

Taxes paid to a county pursuant to this section on sales to a retailer made before January 1, 2000, shall be deemed to satisfy any obligations that the wholesaler may have to pay taxes on the same sales to such municipality that has annexed or newly incorporated the territory where the retailer is located.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 3 (Williams, § 1051.20); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-303; Acts 1983, ch. 234, § 1; 1994, ch. 758, § 2; 1999, ch. 47, § 1; 2013, ch. 189, §§ 1-7.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Changes in municipal boundaries, effect upon receipt and distribution of tax revenues, §6-51-115.

Exemption from wholesale beer tax, §57-6-111.

Receipt and distribution of tax revenues from annexed areas, §6-51-115.

Wholesale beer tax, exclusiveness, §57-6-112.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law (Clyde L. Ball), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1206.

57-6-104. Wholesale prices, container sizes, and sales territories — Regulations — Information declared public record.

Each wholesaler shall maintain a wholesale price list, and shall file the list with the department and with the tax collecting official of each county and municipality wherein the wholesaler makes wholesale sales. Notice of any change in such price list shall be delivered to the department and the tax collecting official of each county and municipality as aforementioned. Notices required herein shall be filed as follows:

In case of a new business or a wholesaler acquiring a new brand not previously distributed, a price list shall be filed within five (5) days after either occurrence; and

In case of any change in an existing price list previously filed, a revised price list shall be filed at least three (3) days prior to the effective date of any change.

A wholesaler shall not be permitted to file a wholesale price list that reduces the price of beer on quantity sales by brand, container, material and category even though the quantity wholesale price is uniform to all retailers and to all other persons. The price shall be fixed on each brand sold by container, material and category. It shall be the same price regardless of the quantity of beer sold of a given brand by container, material and category.

A wholesaler shall not sponsor or participate in any price-cutting maneuver, device or promotion by changing the wholesale price of beer of a given brand, container, material and category. As used in this section, “category” means cans, returnable bottles, nonreturnable bottles, kegs and barrels; “container” means size in ounces; “material” means the principal material used to manufacture each category type, including, but not limited to, metal, glass or plastic.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a wholesaler from permanently reducing the wholesale price of beer. However, any such wholesale price reduction to be construed to be permanent must remain in effect for at least three hundred sixty (360) days, or otherwise it shall be considered a wholesale beer price-cutting maneuver, device or promotion, and in direct violation of this section.

Any wholesaler has the authority to increase the wholesale price of beer, and, in such an event, the increased wholesale price shall be construed and considered to be the posted wholesale beer price. There shall be no limitation on the number of increases of the wholesale price of beer allowed any wholesaler, but no increased wholesale price of beer shall be reduced by the wholesaler for at least three hundred sixty (360) days.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a wholesaler from changing the wholesale price of beer on sales made only at the wholesaler's warehouse to retailers and other persons, regardless of the time element, as referred to in this section in cases of emergency where a wholesaler is unable to make delivery of beer to retail establishments.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a wholesaler from raising the wholesale price of beer during a three hundred sixty (360) day posting period in an amount less than or equal to any increase in the federal excise tax or the state privilege tax levied in § 57-5-201. Such price increase shall be filed within ten (10) days of the date the tax increase takes effect.

All wholesale beer price lists in their entirety are hereby declared to be a public record.

Every manufacturer or importer of beer as defined in § 57-6-102 shall designate sales territories for each of its brands sold in Tennessee, and shall name one (1) licensed beer wholesaler in each territory who, within such territory, shall be the exclusive wholesaler for the brand or brands; provided, that if any such manufacturer or importer supplies more than one (1) brand, exclusive territories may be granted to a different wholesaler for the sale of each brand. No wholesaler shall distribute the specified brand or brands of beer outside such wholesaler's assigned territory, or shall knowingly sell to a retailer whose licensed retail establishment is located outside such wholesaler's assigned territory.

Within thirty (30) days after March 15, 1973, or within ten (10) days prior to the introduction of a new brand of beer in a territory, each manufacturer or importer shall submit to the commissioner, in duplicate, a sworn affidavit containing a description of the geographical boundaries of each territory for each brand of its products, the name and address of the wholesaler and the notarized signature of the wholesaler. Territories in effect on February 1, 1973, and those territories established for new brands entering the market subsequent to that date, shall constitute the exclusive sales territory for the brands and wholesalers involved. Should a manufacturer or importer desire to change wholesalers, or in any way alter the territory of a wholesaler for any brand, such manufacturer or importer shall file with the commissioner and each wholesaler involved, not less than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of such change, a notarized notice of intent, in duplicate, containing:

A description of the geographical boundaries of the proposed territory;

The name and address of the wholesaler currently distributing such brand or brands in the territory;

The name and address of the proposed wholesaler and the notarized signature of the proposed wholesaler; and

The name and address of all persons or firms having a financial interest in the proposed wholesale business.

The ninety-day waiting period shall be waived if the proposed change is agreeable to all parties involved.

The designated territory of beer wholesalers shall be deemed to be a matter of public record, and a copy shall be made available upon request to the commissioner.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 5 (Williams, § 1051.22); Acts 1969, ch. 171, § 2; 1973, ch. 6, § 3; 1974, ch. 571, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-305; Acts 1986, ch. 524, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 75, § 1; 1989, ch. 13, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 617, § 1; 1990, ch. 618, § 13; 1995, ch. 89, § 1; 1998, ch. 857, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 856, § 1d; 2005, ch. 499, §§ 10-14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 856, § 10, effective July 4, 2002, provided that notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of revenue is authorized to waive tax liability and associated interest and penalties otherwise imposed for failure to pay taxes levied pursuant to that act in a timely manner, but only to the extent that the taxpayer or vendor can demonstrate, to the commissioner's satisfaction, that the taxpayer's or vendor's noncompliance with the requirements of the act unavoidably and directly resulted from the close proximity of the effective date of the act with implementation of the increase in tax rates or items or activities taxed pursuant to the provisions of the act. Section 14(j) of the act provided that § 10 be repealed effective September 2, 2002.

Acts 2002, ch. 856, § 13 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to that act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Cross-References. Mandatory suspension for violation of this section, §57-6-114(b).

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-6-105. Records and reports.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations covering reports to be made, records to be kept, and other matters pertaining to the administration and enforcement of this part.

Without limitation as to other matters to be covered, such rules and regulations shall require each wholesaler to report monthly to the department the quantities of the wholesale sales, broken down by unit prices and sizes and types of containers, within each county and municipality in which the wholesaler does business, and to send the tax collecting official of each county and municipality a copy of this report; provided, that wholesalers shall not be required to report sales to individual retailers.

Such rules and regulations shall also require each retailer or the retailer's agent to sign a delivery ticket each time when beer is received from a wholesaler; the wholesaler shall keep the signed original or a digital copy, and the retailer shall retain the duplicate of each such delivery ticket for at least two (2) years, subject to inspection by the department, county or municipality.

Each wholesaler shall keep records showing dates of sale, unit prices, quantities, and sizes and types of containers of beer sold to each individual retailer with whom the wholesaler does business, and such records shall be retained for at least two (2) years, subject to audit by the department, and/or county and/or municipality.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 6 (Williams, § 1051.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-306; Acts 1986, ch. 525, § 2; 2012, ch. 657, § 10.

57-6-106. Investigations by the department.

The department on its own initiative may, or upon request of any county or municipality receiving this tax shall, make investigations to determine whether the full amount of tax imposed by this part has been paid, providing that any county or municipality requesting such investigation may designate an agent to participate in the investigation. For this purpose, wholesalers and retailers shall make their books and records with respect to beer purchases, sales and inventories available for inspection and audit at all reasonable business hours, and shall furnish any information with respect to beer purchases, sales and inventories required by the department. The results of such investigations shall be reported to counties and municipalities concerned.

The department, upon request of any county or municipality concerned, shall provide information available in the department with respect to the administration of this part, including the amount of tax collected and remitted, within the county or municipality.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 8 (Williams, § 1051.25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-308.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

57-6-107. Wholesaler's bond — Collection of delinquent taxes — Penalties.

Every wholesaler shall furnish an indemnity or personal bond, satisfactory to the department and payable to the department, as agent of the counties and municipalities involved, in an amount equivalent to the amount of gross tax payable under this part, based on the wholesaler's highest month's sales in the preceding twelve (12) months or on an estimate of sales in the case of a wholesaler just commencing business. In no event shall a bond in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) be required.

Should any wholesaler fail or refuse to remit the tax on or before the twentieth of the month when due, the department or any county or municipality concerned may institute legal action for collection of such delinquent taxes by any method now authorized by law for the collection of delinquent privileges taxes, or by suit.

In addition to the hereinabove authorized powers and penalties, the suspension and revocation powers conferred in § 57-5-108 upon county legislative bodies and other governmental bodies referred to therein are likewise conferred herein upon the commissioner, as they may relate to persons to whom certificates of registration are issued by the commissioner under § 57-5-102. Such suspension and revocation powers may be invoked for the failure of such person to file any report required by this part, or for the filing of a false or fraudulent report, or for the failure to pay tax due by any such licensee with the intent to defraud under this part and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto and for no other reasons. The remedy provided by § 57-5-108 shall, likewise, be the only method of reviewing orders of the commissioner revoking or suspending such certificates of registration as authorized herein.

In lieu of a corporate surety on the bond required by subsection (a), the commissioner may allow the wholesaler to secure such bond by depositing collateral in the form of a certificate of deposit as accepted and authorized by the banking laws of this state, which has a face value equal to the amount of the bond. Such collateral may be deposited with any authorized state depository designated by the commissioner. Interest on any deposited certificate of deposit shall be payable to the wholesaler who has deposited it as collateral, or to such person as the wholesaler or the certificate may direct.

If a wholesaler has been in continuous operation for three (3) consecutive years and during the preceding six (6) months has paid all taxes payable under this part on or before the twentieth of the month when due, then the wholesaler shall not be required to furnish any indemnity or personal bond required by this section.

Any wholesaler exempted from the bonding requirement of this section who fails to pay any tax payable under this part on or before the twentieth of the month when due, shall, upon such failure, be required to furnish an indemnity or personal bond as provided in this section.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 9 (Williams, § 1051.26); Acts 1973, ch. 6, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-309; Acts 1980, ch. 885, § 7; 1987, ch. 160, § 1; 1988, ch. 519, § 2; 1988, ch. 526, § 16; 1992, ch. 607, § 2; 1996, ch. 641, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 526, § 45 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to all assessments of penalty made on or after January 1, 1989.

57-6-108. Cash sales only to retailers.

In order to effectively collect the tax levied by this part all sales of beer by wholesalers to retailers or any other persons, except sales to duly licensed wholesalers and sales within military installations as set out in §57-6-111, shall be for cash only. The intent of this section is that wholesale sale of beer and delivery and payment therefor shall be a simultaneous transaction, and any maneuver, device or method of extending credit is expressly prohibited.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 10 (Williams, § 1051.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-310.

57-6-109. Breakage and shortage adjustments only at time of delivery — Quality control.

In order to accurately determine the tax to be paid, no wholesaler shall make any reduction or adjustment for loss due to shortages or damaged or broken containers, except for the actual loss from the time the beer leaves the brewery until it is delivered to the retailer.

Such reductions or adjustments shall not exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the total monthly purchases of each wholesaler, except in cases of fire, storms, acts of God or unavoidable accidents.

Any claims in excess of one-half of one percent (0.5%) must be substantiated by sworn statements of at least two (2) witnesses or persons otherwise familiar with the facts concerning such loss.

Any and all claims for such credits may be disapproved by the department of revenue.

All beer shall be inspected and accepted by the retailer or the retailer's representative at the time of delivery and no adjustment or refund for damage, breakage or shortage shall be made by any wholesaler subsequent to the time of delivery to the retailer. A wholesaler may determine that beer sold to a retailer does not conform to quality control standards. Upon making that determination, the wholesaler may provide the retailer with replacement beer in exchange for the beer that no longer conforms to quality control standards, if the tax paid on the total amount of replacement beer is equal to the tax credit received on the beer being returned by the retailer.

A wholesaler may purchase full case lots of beer previously sold to a retailer by the wholesaler at the price at which the beer was sold to the retailer:

Upon determination by a county or municipality that:

A retailer has surrendered or abandoned its permit to sell beer;

A retailer's permit to sell beer has been revoked; or

A retailer's permit to sell beer has been suspended for more than thirty (30) days; or

When a retailer has in good faith discontinued business for more than thirty (30) days.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 11 (Williams, § 1051.28); Acts 1968, ch. 628, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-311; Acts 1988, ch. 466, § 2; 1990, ch. 626, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Wholesale beer tax and quality control standards determination. OAG 12-54, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 54 (5/21/12).

57-6-110. Gifts or inducements to retailers — Discounts to consumers.

In order to determine the exact amount of the tax and to facilitate the collection thereof, no wholesaler shall make any gift of beer or any other type of gift to any retailer, nor shall any deal be made with any retailer or any other person whereby the wholesale price of beer shall be reduced below the list price above provided for as inducement to the retailer or any other person to make larger purchases; provided, however, that a manufacturer may offer, by coupons provided by a manufacturer, a discount to the consumer to be redeemed only by the manufacturer. Neither a retailer nor a wholesaler shall participate, either directly or indirectly, in the redemption of such coupons.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 12 (Williams, § 1051.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-312; Acts 1987, ch. 72, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-6-111. Exemption of sales to armed forces installations.

The tax levied herein shall not be applicable to any beer and/or ale sold to any post exchange, ship service store, commissary, open mess, officers' club, N.C.O. club or other organization recognized by and located on any fort, base, camp or post of the armed forces of the United States. Wholesalers and brewers duly licensed in Tennessee shall be relieved of the tax imposed herein on all beer and/or ale sold at any fort, base, camp or post of the armed forces of the United States; provided, that such sales are listed on the monthly reports required herein; and provided further, that a copy of a receipt duly signed by the officer or noncommissioned officer in charge of such clubs, certifying that such beer or ale was sold to and delivered to such clubs at such fort, base, camp or post, is attached to such report.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 13 (Williams, § 1051.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-313.

Cross-References. Exemption from state privilege tax, §57-5-208.

57-6-112. Exclusiveness of tax.

Any county or municipality which collects the tax as provided herein shall not be authorized to levy any other sales tax, inspection fee or special tax of any type or kind except the privilege license fee authorized by chapter 5 of this title on the sale of beer either at retail or wholesale.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 14 (Williams, § 1051.31); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-314.

57-6-113. Enforcement of law.

Municipal and county officials are given the authority to and are charged with the responsibility of enforcing this part as well as the department.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 15 (Williams, § 1051.32); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-315.

57-6-114. Criminal penalties.

A violation of this part is a Class C misdemeanor.

It shall be mandatory on the local beer board to suspend the license or permit of the wholesaler for thirty (30) days for violating § 57-6-104, within the city or county where the violation was committed.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 16 (Williams, § 1051.33); Acts 1969, ch. 171, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-316; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-6-115. Damaged or unaccepted goods — Tax liability.

When any common carrier transporting beer to a point within this state, or any insurance company insuring such beer, comes into possession of such beer by virtue of the same being damaged or otherwise unaccepted by the consignee of such beer, such common carrier or insurance company shall become liable for the tax imposed under this part, unless proof deemed satisfactory to the commissioner of revenue is furnished to the commissioner by such carrier or insurer showing that such beer has been destroyed or shipped to a point without this state and, therefore, has not been sold or consumed in this state.

Acts 1971, ch. 150, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-320.

57-6-116. Expenses of enforcement of law limited.

For the purpose of carrying out this part, the commissioner of revenue is authorized to transfer from any funds allocated for the operation of the department, the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), which sum shall be repaid out of funds received under this part. In no event shall the department be called upon to render greater services or expend funds in excess of the amount received by the department as provided herein.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 17 (Williams, § 1051.34); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-317.

57-6-117. Construction of law — Invalidity.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph or section of this part be declared unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, such determination shall render invalid the remaining part of the part, it being hereby declared to be the legislative intent not to enact the part unless that part so held invalid was included therein.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 18 (Williams, § 1051.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-318.

57-6-118. Effect of unconstitutionality of part.

In the event this part is declared unconstitutional, it is declared to be the legislative intent not to have repealed Acts 1951, ch. 37, and such act shall, in that event, be in full force and effect.

Acts 1953, ch. 76, § 19 (Williams, § 1051.36); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-319.